Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1402
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 46-1401 and 46-1403 to 46-1405, the definitions found in sections 46-1206.01, 46-1207.01, 46-1209, 46-1212, and 46-1213 shall be used.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 5.